Illinois, session 104th, HB2454.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Local Governmental and Governmental 5Employees Tort Immunity Act is amended by changing Section 63-102 as follows: 7    (745 ILCS 10/3-102)  (from Ch. 85, par. 3-102)8    Sec. 3-102. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this 9Article, a local public entity has the duty to exercise 10ordinary care to maintain its property in a reasonably safe 11condition for the use in the exercise of ordinary care of 12people whom the entity intended and permitted to use the 13property in a manner in which and at such times as it was 14reasonably foreseeable that it would be used, and shall not be 15liable for injury unless it is proven that it has actual or 16constructive notice of the existence of such a condition that 17is not reasonably safe in reasonably adequate time prior to an 18injury to have taken measures to remedy or protect against 19such condition. A person operating a bicycle is deemed to be an 20intended user of every roadway and portion of roadway on which 21bicyclists are permitted to ride. 22    (b) A public entity does not have constructive notice of a 23condition of its property that is not reasonably safe within   HB2454- 2 -LRB104 08997 JRC 19053 b1the meaning of Section 3-102(a) if it establishes either:2    (1) The existence of the condition and its character of 3not being reasonably safe would not have been discovered by an 4inspection system that was reasonably adequate considering the 5practicability and cost of inspection weighed against the 6likelihood and magnitude of the potential danger to which 7failure to inspect would give rise to inform the public entity 8whether the property was safe for the use or uses for which the 9public entity used or intended others to use the public 10property and for uses that the public entity actually knew 11others were making of the public property or adjacent 12property; or13    (2) The public entity maintained and operated such an 14inspection system with due care and did not discover the 15condition.16(Source: P.A. 84-1431.)